Arkansas, session 2025, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 13-2-204(b), concerning the State
Librarian, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, The
the State Librarian shall be a person of good professional standing and
reputation, holding at least a master's degree from a graduate school of
library science accredited by the American Library Association, and shall
have had experience in library administration in academic, public, school, or
special libraries.
(2) Work experience in the field of library science may be
substituted for a master's degree from a graduate school of library science
accredited by the American Library Association if approved by the board.
(3) The requirements under subdivision (b)(2) of this section
shall not disqualify the library from receiving state funds.

*LGL050*
02-10-2025 11:14:21 LGL050

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 SB181
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 13-2-905(c)(2), concerning the regional
library directors for regional library systems, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this
section, The the director shall have a master's degree from an accredited
American Library Association program.
(B) Work experience in the field of library operations may
be substituted for a master's degree from an accredited program in library
operations if approved by the regional library system board of trustees
employing the director.
(C) The requirements under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this
section shall not disqualify a regional library system from receiving state
funds.

/s/D. Sullivan





















02-10-2025 11:14:21 LGL050